Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-756
Industrial sickness and accident insurance; insurers authorized to write.

Any insurer authorized to write sickness and accident insurance in this state shall have power to issue policies of industrial sickness and accident insurance.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 14(2), p. 467;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 151.